Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-416.01
Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee; members.

The Legislature shall select five of its members who shall serve, together with the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee, as the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee. The Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee shall be a standing committee of the Legislature. The chairperson and members shall be chosen in the same manner as chairpersons and members of the other standing committees of the Legislature.

Laws 1989, LB 189, § 1.